Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.561

Costs and expenses.

If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the prosecutor or attorney general and law enforcement officers under RCW 26.27.541 or 26.27.551.

[ 2001 c 65 s 317.]